Utah statutes.
70C-1-203.   Limitation on creditor's remedies in out-of-state transactions.
The part on limitations on creditors' remedies, Sections 70C-7-101 through
70C-7-107, applies to any actions or other proceedings brought in this state
to enforce rights arising from a consumer credit contract or consumer credit
transaction of any kind, wherever made.
